Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

Jurisdiction and Powers

16-10-101. General jurisdiction.

The circuit court is a court of general jurisdiction, and the judge of the circuit court shall administer right and justice according to law, in all cases where the jurisdiction is not conferred upon another tribunal.

Code 1858, § 4225 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 7); Shan., § 6063; Code 1932, § 10318; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-501.

Cross-References. Bonds of county officers, duties, §§ 8-19-205 — 8-19-208.

Exclusive original jurisdiction of juvenile court, § 37-1-103.

Personal injury or death cases in chancery or circuit courts, reports, § 16-21-111.

State system of personnel administration, § 8-30-101 et seq.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 338.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 18; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 9; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

Laches at Law in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 211 (1997).

The Tennessee Court of Appeals: How Often It Corrects the Trial Courts — and Why, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (2001).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Comparative Legislation. Circuit courts:

Ala. Code § 12-11-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 16-13-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 15-6-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 23A.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 9-7-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 478.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-130 et seq.

Va. Code § 17-116.1 et seq.

Cited: Harris v. Nashville Trust Co., 5 Tenn. Civ. App. (5 Higgins) 678 (1914); State v. Bockman, 139 Tenn. 422, 201 S.W. 741, 1917 Tenn. LEXIS 118 (1917); Roberts v. Vaughn, 142 Tenn. 361, 219 S.W. 1034, 1919 Tenn. LEXIS 65, 9 A.L.R. 1528 (1920); Carriger v. Morristown, 148 Tenn. 585, 256 S.W. 883, 1923 Tenn. LEXIS 45 (1923).

16-10-102. Criminal jurisdiction.

The circuit court has exclusive original jurisdiction of all crimes and misdemeanors, either at common law or by statute, unless otherwise expressly provided by statute or this code.

Code 1858, § 4226 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 3); Shan., § 6064; mod. Code 1932, § 10319; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-502.

Cross-References. Original jurisdiction of criminal matters, § 40-1-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction of juvenile courts over misdemeanors of child abuse and neglect and contributing to delinquency, OAG 93-24 (3/29/93).

Cited: State v. McFarland, 638 S.W.2d 416, 1982 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 378 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1982); State v. Keller, 813 S.W.2d 146, 1991 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 214 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1991); State v. Nixon, 977 S.W.2d 119, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1202 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997); State v. Booher, 978 S.W.2d 953, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 799 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997); Clinton Books, Inc. v. City of Memphis, 197 S.W.3d 749, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 313 (Tenn. 2006); Haynie v. Bell, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 486 (Tenn. Crim. App. June 22, 2007); Brewer v. State, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 266 (Tenn. Crim. App. Apr. 8, 2008); Blackwell v. Haslam, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 23 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 11, 2012).

16-10-103. Will contests.

The circuit court has jurisdiction to try and determine all issues made up to contest the validity of last wills and testaments.

Code 1858, § 4227 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 9); Shan., § 6065; Code 1932, § 10320; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-503; Acts 1991, ch. 152, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 5; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: State v. Lancaster, 119 Tenn. 638, 105 S.W. 858, 1907 Tenn. LEXIS 27 (1907); Scott v. Atkins, 44 Tenn. App. 353, 314 S.W.2d 52, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 161 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957); In re Estate of Powers, 767 S.W.2d 659, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 756 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988).

16-10-104. Restoration of citizenship.

The circuit court has exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine applications to be restored to citizenship, made by persons who have been rendered infamous by the judgment of any court of this state.

Code 1858, § 4228 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 30, § 1); Shan., § 6066; Code 1932, § 10321; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Citizenship, § 2; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systematic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

Cited: In re Curtis, 6 Tenn. Civ. App. (6 Higgins) 12 (1915).

Collateral References. 21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 11, 490.

Courts
472.1.

16-10-105. Arbitrations and agreed cases.

The circuit court has jurisdiction to enter judgments on awards of arbitrators and to hear and determine agreed cases.

Code 1858, § 4229 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 173); Shan., § 6067; Code 1932, § 10322; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-505.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Kelly v. Milan, 21 F. 842, 1884 U.S. App. LEXIS 2460 (C.C.D. Tenn. 1884).

16-10-106. Contractual debts and demands.

The circuit court has jurisdiction, concurrent with courts of general sessions, to the extent of the jurisdiction of the courts of general sessions, of all debts and demands on contract over fifty dollars ($50.00).

Code 1858, § 4230 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 7); Shan., § 6068; Code 1932, § 10323; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-506.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Lee v. Hall, 790 S.W.2d 293, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990).

16-10-107. Change of name — Legitimation.

The circuit court and the chancery court have concurrent jurisdiction to change and alter the names of persons and to legitimate children.

Code 1858, § 4231 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 2); Shan., § 6069; Code 1932, § 10324; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 202; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-507; Acts 1984, ch. 682, § 1.

Cross-References. Paternity and legitimation, title 36, ch. 2, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

Change of Names, Legitimation, and Adoption, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 418.

Cited: Milwaukee Ins. Co. v. Gordon, 54 Tenn. App. 279, 390 S.W.2d 680, 1964 Tenn. App. LEXIS 153 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1964).

Collateral References.

Circumstances justifying grant denial or denial of petition to change adult's name. 79 A.L.R.3d 562.

Right of married woman to use maiden surname. 67 A.L.R.3d 1266.

Courts
472.3.

16-10-108. Divorce — Adoption — Trustees.

The circuit court has concurrent jurisdiction with the chancery court to grant divorces, to authorize the adoption of children, to release testamentary and other trustees, and to appoint trustees in place of those released or dead, and also to decree, on petitions of trustees, by will or otherwise, for the sale of property, real or personal.

Code 1858, § 4232 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 4; 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 1; 1845-1846, ch. 194; 1847-1848, ch. 13); Shan., § 6070; Code 1932, § 10325; Acts 1951, ch. 202, § 40 (Williams, § 9572.52); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-508.

Cross-References. Adoption, title 36, ch. 1.

Appointment and removal of trustees, title 35, ch. 1.

Divorce and annulment, title 36, ch. 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Divorce and Alimony, §§ 2, 18; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Davis v. Davis, 87 Tenn. 200, 10 S.W. 363, 1888 Tenn. LEXIS 53 (1889); Leach v. Cowan, 125 Tenn. 182, 140 S.W. 1070, 1911 Tenn. LEXIS 18 (1911); Rains v. Rains, 58 Tenn. App. 214, 428 S.W.2d 650, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 295 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); In re Shumate, 39 B.R. 808, 1984 Bankr. LEXIS 5780 (Bankr. E.D. Tenn. 1984); Sizemore v. Sizemore, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 486 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 30, 2007).

16-10-109. Partition and sale of property.

The circuit court has concurrent jurisdiction with the chancery and county courts to make partition and distribution; and, for this purpose, to sell property, real or personal, if necessary, or manifestly to the interest of the parties; and to sell land to pay debts of decedents where the personal assets are insufficient.

Code 1858, § 4233 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 4; 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 1); Shan., § 6071; Code 1932, § 10326; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-509.

Cross-References. Distribution, partition, and sale of realty in certain counties, § 16-16-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 124; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Summers v. Conger, 43 Tenn. App. 286, 307 S.W.2d 936, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 116 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957).

16-10-110. Abatement of nuisances.

The circuit court is clothed with all the powers of the chancery court to abate nuisances, in an action brought for recovery of damages resulting from a nuisance, upon the finding of a jury that the subject matter of a complaint is a nuisance, and judgment entered thereon.

Code 1858, § 4235; Shan., § 6073; Code 1932, § 10328; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-510.

Cross-References. Abatement of nuisances, title 29, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Collateral References.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 A.L.R.3d 665.

Nuisance
28.

16-10-111. Equity powers.

Any suit of an equitable nature, brought in the circuit court, where objection has not been taken to the jurisdiction, may be transferred to the chancery court of the county, or heard and determined by the circuit court upon the principles of a court of equity, with power to order and take all proper accounts, and otherwise to perform the functions of a chancery court.

Code 1858, § 4236 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 9); Shan., § 6074; mod. Code 1932, § 10329; Acts 1972, ch. 565, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-511.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 8, 9, 56, 444.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 776.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 118; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 2, 21-29, 32; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 7; 22 Tenn. Juris., Rescission, Cancellation and Reformation, § 33.

Law Reviews.

A Little Bit of Laches Goes a Long Way: Notes on Petrella v. Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, Inc., 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 1 (2014).

Laches at Law in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 211 (1997).

The Supreme Court and the New Equity, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 997 (2015).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Finch v. Frymire, 36 S.W. 883, 1896 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 13 (1896); United States, use of Brading-Marshal Lumber Co. v. Wells, 203 F. 146, 1913 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1718 (D. Tenn. 1913); Sullivan v. Eason, 8 Tenn. App. 429, — S.W.2d —, 1928 Tenn. App. LEXIS 156 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1928); McGee v. Carter, 31 Tenn. App. 141, 212 S.W.2d 902, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 78 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1948); Gilley v. Jernigan, 597 S.W.2d 313, 1979 Tenn. App. LEXIS 395 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1979); Clinton Books, Inc. v. City of Memphis, 197 S.W.3d 749, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 313 (Tenn. 2006); In re Estate of Brown, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 541 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 4, 2011).

16-10-112. Appellate jurisdiction.

The circuit court has an appellate jurisdiction of all suits and actions, of whatsoever nature, unless otherwise provided, instituted before any inferior jurisdiction, whether brought by appeal, certiorari, or in any other manner prescribed by law.

Code 1858, § 4234 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 3); Shan., § 6072; mod. Code 1932, § 10327; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-512.

Cross-References. Juvenile courts, appeal from judgment or order as to disposition of child, § 37-1-135.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 16.109.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 22; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recovery of Personal Property, § 15.

Law Reviews.

Alternative Dispute Resolution in the Personal Injury Forum (William P. Zdancewicz), 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1169 (1996).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

Cited: Staples v. Brown, 113 Tenn. 639, 85 S.W. 254, 1904 Tenn. LEXIS 56 (1904); Binford v. Carline, 9 Tenn. App. 364, — S.W.2d —, 1928 Tenn. App. LEXIS 246 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1928); Riden v. Snider, 832 S.W.2d 341, 1991 Tenn. App. LEXIS 901 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1991).

16-10-113. Jurisdiction of contract enforcement.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, contracts for goods or services between individuals, partnerships, associations, corporations, governmental entities or limited liability companies are enforceable in either circuit or chancery court in the county where:

The defendant may be found;

The contract was executed;

The goods were provided or were to be provided; or

Services were rendered or were to be rendered.

Acts 2007, ch. 351, § 1.